Arkansas, session 2025, HB1971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-303(h), concerning allowable
disclosures of tax records maintained by the Department of Finance and
Administration, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) Upon the request of a county government or a city government,
the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide a
report that includes a list of vendors within the requesting county or city
who hold permits issued pursuant to under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of
1941, § 26-52-101 et seq., or the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, §
26-53-101 et seq.
(2) Requests made pursuant to under this subsection must may be
made at any time and shall be made in writing submitted electronically by an
official of the county government or city government prior to August 1 of the
*JLL382*
04/01/2025 7:18:16 PM JLL382

HB1971
calendar year for which the list is requested.
(3)(A) Lists provided pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection will be made available following October 1 of the year requested
and will be compiled from the list of all valid sales tax permit holders
within the requesting county or city as of September 1 of the year requested.
The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare and deliver a
report under subdivision (h)(1) of this section, by vendor, that contains a
list of vendors by name and the four-digit code of the North American
Industry Classification System assigned to each vendor within the requesting
county or city for the year.
(B) A report prepared under this subsection shall be
delivered electronically.
(4)(A) A reasonable fee based upon the number of permit holders
within the requesting city or county may be charged for the permit search
made and reported to the requesting county or city government.
(B) Fees collected under the provisions of this subsection
shall be deposited into the State Central Services Fund to be treated as a
refund of expenditures to reimburse the Department of Finance and
Administration for the costs of providing the requested information. In
order to receive a report under this subsection, the city government or
county government making the request shall register for an account with the
Arkansas Taxpayer Access Point, or its successor portal.
(5) The Department of Finance and Administration shall not
discuss any details of a report prepared under this subsection with the city
government or county government making the request under this subsection or
with a third party.
(6) Information received by a city government or a county
government under this subsection shall remain confidential and is not subject
to disclosure except in accordance with this section.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on and
after January 1, 2026.




04/01/2025 7:18:16 PM JLL382